Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-8218
Applicability of insurance laws.

(1) The insurance laws of this state shall not apply to captive insurers except as permitted in the Captive Insurers Act.

(2) The following provisions of Chapter 44 apply to captive insurers:

(a) The Insurers Examination Act;

(b) Sections 44-101, 44-101.01, 44-102, 44-103, 44-114, 44-116, 44-154, 44-205.01, 44-231, 44-301, 44-318, 44-320, 44-326, and 44-360; and

(c) The Nebraska Insurers Supervision, Rehabilitation, and Liquidation Act. Such act shall only apply to a captive insurer that provides insurance and reinsurance to a parent or affiliated entity that is an insurer.

Laws 2007, LB117, § 52.

Insurers Examination Act, see section 44-5901.

Nebraska Insurers Supervision, Rehabilitation, and Liquidation Act, see section 44-4862.